__1st_try_roman_lexica__/pr.lexc
!!!pr.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Pr +Sg +Pl +1P +2P +3P

LEXICON Root
Pr;

LEXICON PrInf
+Pr:0 #;

LEXICON Pr1sg
+Pr+1P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr2sg
+Pr+2P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr3sg
+Pr+3P+Sg:0 #;

LEXICON Pr1pl
+Pr+1P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr2pl
+Pr+2P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr3pl
+Pr+3P+Pl:0 #;

LEXICON Pr
!Subject Pronouns
mn Pr1sg;
tw Pr2sg;
aw Pr3sg;
ma Pr1pl;
šma Pr2pl;
ānea Pr3pl;
!Lexical items from corpus
xwd	PrInf;
mn	PrInf;
emyn	PrInf;
ānea	PrInf;
tan	PrInf;
aynan	PrInf;
šan	PrInf;
kw	PrInf;
emanea	PrInf;
eyč	PrInf;
ma	PrInf;
ān	PrInf;
ayn	PrInf;
šma	PrInf;
emdygr	PrInf;
am	PrInf;
t	PrInf;
čy	PrInf;
emanea	PrInf;
ān_ea	PrInf;
ānea	PrInf;
kdam	PrInf;
š	PrInf;
m	PrInf;
tw	PrInf;
xwdman	PrInf;
ma	PrInf;
ān	PrInf;
ayn	PrInf;
mn	PrInf;
man	PrInf;
če	PrInf;
emyn	PrInf;
ān_ea	PrInf;
xwyš	PrInf;
xwdš	PrInf;
ānja	PrInf;
ānan	PrInf;
čnyn	PrInf;
maea	PrInf;
xwdšan	PrInf;
dygran	PrInf;
čŕdr	PrInf;
xwd	PrInf;
ks	PrInf;
#est	PrInf;
krd#kn	PrInf;
kja	PrInf;
aynjanb	PrInf;
aw	PrInf;
ā_nea	PrInf;
eman	PrInf;
emdygr	PrInf;
ān	PrInf;
ykdygr	PrInf;
šma	PrInf;
š	PrInf;
t	PrInf;
ky	PrInf;
ayn_ea	PrInf;
aynea	PrInf;
ke	PrInf;
ānea	PrInf;
xwdm	PrInf;
ā_ea	PrInf;
m	PrInf;
bnde	PrInf;
aš	PrInf;
ﺧﻮd	PrInf;
ānče	PrInf;
emynan	PrInf;
ayn	PrInf;
mn	PrInf;
xwdt	PrInf;
dygry	PrInf;
xwdtan	PrInf;
ayšan	PrInf;
ānčnan	PrInf;
eme	PrInf;
tw	PrInf;
čnan	PrInf;
wy	PrInf;
em	PrInf;
xwyštn	PrInf;
ayn_janb	PrInf;
b'źy	PrInf;
